District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Community Schools Task Force Emergency Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 403(i)(2) of the Community Schools Incentive Act of 2012, effective June
19, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-142; D.C. Official Code § 38-754.03(i)(2)), is amended by striking the
phrase “District residents” and inserting the word “individuals” in its place.
Sec. 3. Amendatory section 403(i)(2) in section 4082(c) of the Community Schools Grant
Program Amendment Act of 2026, enacted on August 14, 2026 (D.C. Act 26-418; 73 DCR
11735), is amended by striking the phrase “District residents” and inserting the word
“individuals” in its place.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2